dictionaries/fr_FR-reformed/fr_FR-reformed.aff
FLAG long
SFX b4 Y 254
SFX b4 er er/17 er 22
SFX b4 er ant/18 [^c]er 23
SFX b4 cer çant/18 cer 23
SFX b4 ecer èce/11 ecer 28
SFX b4 emer ème/11 emer 28
SFX b4 ener ène/11 ener 28
SFX b4 eper èpe/11 eper 28
SFX b4 erer ère/11 erer 28
SFX b4 eser èse/11 eser 28
SFX b4 ever ève/11 ever 28
SFX b4 evrer èvre/11 evrer 28
SFX b4 eter ète/11 eter 28
SFX b4 eler èle/11 eler 28
SFX b4 ecer èces/6 ecer 29
SFX b4 emer èmes/6 emer 29
SFX b4 ener ènes/6 ener 29
SFX b4 eper èpes/6 eper 29
SFX b4 erer ères/6 erer 29
SFX b4 eser èses/6 eser 29
SFX b4 ever èves/6 ever 29
SFX b4 evrer èvres/6 evrer 29
SFX b4 eter ètes/6 eter 29
SFX b4 eler èles/6 eler 29
SFX b4 ecer èce/18 ecer 30
SFX b4 emer ème/18 emer 30
SFX b4 ener ène/18 ener 30
SFX b4 eper èpe/18 eper 30
SFX b4 erer ère/18 erer 30
SFX b4 eser èse/18 eser 30
SFX b4 ever ève/18 ever 30
SFX b4 evrer èvre/18 evrer 30
SFX b4 eter ète/18 eter 30
SFX b4 eler èle/18 eler 30
SFX b4 er ons/9 [^c]er 31
SFX b4 cer çons/9 cer 31
SFX b4 er ez/10 er 32
SFX b4 ecer ècent/18 ecer 33
SFX b4 emer èment/18 emer 33
SFX b4 ener ènent/18 ener 33
SFX b4 eper èpent/18 eper 33
SFX b4 erer èrent/18 erer 33
SFX b4 eser èsent/18 eser 33
SFX b4 ever èvent/18 ever 33
SFX b4 evrer èvrent/18 evrer 33
SFX b4 eter ètent/18 eter 33
SFX b4 eler èlent/18 eler 33
SFX b4 er ais/11 [^c]er 34
SFX b4 cer çais/11 cer 34
SFX b4 er ais/6 [^c]er 35
SFX b4 cer çais/6 cer 35
SFX b4 er ait/18 [^c]er 36
SFX b4 cer çait/18 cer 36
SFX b4 er ions/9 er 37
SFX b4 er iez/10 er 38
SFX b4 er aient/18 [^c]er 39
SFX b4 cer çaient/18 cer 39
SFX b4 er ai/11 [^c]er 40
SFX b4 cer çai/11 cer 40
SFX b4 er as/6 [^c]er 42
SFX b4 cer ças/6 cer 42
SFX b4 er a/18 [^c]er 43
SFX b4 cer ça/18 cer 43
SFX b4 er âmes/9 [^c]er 44
SFX b4 cer çâmes/9 cer 44
SFX b4 er âtes/10 [^c]er 45
SFX b4 cer çâtes/10 cer 45
SFX b4 er èrent/18 er 46
SFX b4 ecer ècerai/11 ecer 47
SFX b4 emer èmerai/11 emer 47
SFX b4 ener ènerai/11 ener 47
SFX b4 eper èperai/11 eper 47
SFX b4 erer èrerai/11 erer 47
SFX b4 eser èserai/11 eser 47
SFX b4 ever èverai/11 ever 47
SFX b4 evrer èvrerai/11 evrer 47
SFX b4 eter èterai/11 eter 47
SFX b4 eler èlerai/11 eler 47
SFX b4 ecer èceras/6 ecer 48
SFX b4 emer èmeras/6 emer 48
SFX b4 ener èneras/6 ener 48
SFX b4 eper èperas/6 eper 48
SFX b4 erer èreras/6 erer 48
SFX b4 eser èseras/6 eser 48
SFX b4 ever èveras/6 ever 48
SFX b4 evrer èvreras/6 evrer 48
SFX b4 eter èteras/6 eter 48
SFX b4 eler èleras/6 eler 48
SFX b4 ecer ècera/18 ecer 49
SFX b4 emer èmera/18 emer 49
SFX b4 ener ènera/18 ener 49
SFX b4 eper èpera/18 eper 49
SFX b4 erer èrera/18 erer 49
SFX b4 eser èsera/18 eser 49
SFX b4 ever èvera/18 ever 49
SFX b4 evrer èvrera/18 evrer 49
SFX b4 eter ètera/18 eter 49
SFX b4 eler èlera/18 eler 49
SFX b4 ecer ècerons/9 ecer 50
SFX b4 emer èmerons/9 emer 50
SFX b4 ener ènerons/9 ener 50
SFX b4 eper èperons/9 eper 50
SFX b4 erer èrerons/9 erer 50
SFX b4 eser èserons/9 eser 50
SFX b4 ever èverons/9 ever 50
SFX b4 evrer èvrerons/9 evrer 50
SFX b4 eter èterons/9 eter 50
SFX b4 eler èlerons/9 eler 50
SFX b4 ecer ècerez/10 ecer 51
SFX b4 emer èmerez/10 emer 51
SFX b4 ener ènerez/10 ener 51
SFX b4 eper èperez/10 eper 51
SFX b4 erer èrerez/10 erer 51
SFX b4 eser èserez/10 eser 51
SFX b4 ever èverez/10 ever 51
SFX b4 evrer èvrerez/10 evrer 51
SFX b4 eter èterez/10 eter 51
SFX b4 eler èlerez/10 eler 51
SFX b4 ecer èceront/18 ecer 52
SFX b4 emer èmeront/18 emer 52
SFX b4 ener èneront/18 ener 52
SFX b4 eper èperont/18 eper 52
SFX b4 erer èreront/18 erer 52
SFX b4 eser èseront/18 eser 52
SFX b4 ever èveront/18 ever 52
SFX b4 evrer èvreront/18 evrer 52
SFX b4 eter èteront/18 eter 52
SFX b4 eler èleront/18 eler 52
SFX b4 ecer ècerais/11 ecer 53
SFX b4 emer èmerais/11 emer 53
SFX b4 ener ènerais/11 ener 53
SFX b4 eper èperais/11 eper 53
SFX b4 erer èrerais/11 erer 53
SFX b4 eser èserais/11 eser 53
SFX b4 ever èverais/11 ever 53
SFX b4 evrer èvrerais/11 evrer 53
SFX b4 eter èterais/11 eter 53
SFX b4 eler èlerais/11 eler 53
SFX b4 ecer ècerais/6 ecer 54
SFX b4 emer èmerais/6 emer 54
SFX b4 ener ènerais/6 ener 54
SFX b4 eper èperais/6 eper 54
SFX b4 erer èrerais/6 erer 54
SFX b4 eser èserais/6 eser 54
SFX b4 ever èverais/6 ever 54
SFX b4 evrer èvrerais/6 evrer 54
SFX b4 eter èterais/6 eter 54
SFX b4 eler èlerais/6 eler 54
SFX b4 ecer ècerait/18 ecer 55
SFX b4 emer èmerait/18 emer 55
SFX b4 ener ènerait/18 ener 55
SFX b4 eper èperait/18 eper 55
SFX b4 erer èrerait/18 erer 55
SFX b4 eser èserait/18 eser 55
SFX b4 ever èverait/18 ever 55
SFX b4 evrer èvrerait/18 evrer 55
SFX b4 eter èterait/18 eter 55
SFX b4 eler èlerait/18 eler 55
SFX b4 ecer ècerions/9 ecer 56
SFX b4 emer èmerions/9 emer 56
SFX b4 ener ènerions/9 ener 56
SFX b4 eper èperions/9 eper 56
SFX b4 erer èrerions/9 erer 56
SFX b4 eser èserions/9 eser 56
SFX b4 ever èverions/9 ever 56
SFX b4 evrer èvrerions/9 evrer 56
SFX b4 eter èterions/9 eter 56
SFX b4 eler èlerions/9 eler 56
SFX b4 ecer èceriez/10 ecer 57
SFX b4 emer èmeriez/10 emer 57
SFX b4 ener èneriez/10 ener 57
SFX b4 eper èperiez/10 eper 57
SFX b4 erer èreriez/10 erer 57
SFX b4 eser èseriez/10 eser 57
SFX b4 ever èveriez/10 ever 57
SFX b4 evrer èvreriez/10 evrer 57
SFX b4 eter èteriez/10 eter 57
SFX b4 eler èleriez/10 eler 57
SFX b4 ecer èceraient/18 ecer 58
SFX b4 emer èmeraient/18 emer 58
SFX b4 ener èneraient/18 ener 58
SFX b4 eper èperaient/18 eper 58
SFX b4 erer èreraient/18 erer 58
SFX b4 eser èseraient/18 eser 58
SFX b4 ever èveraient/18 ever 58
SFX b4 evrer èvreraient/18 evrer 58
SFX b4 eter èteraient/18 eter 58
SFX b4 eler èleraient/18 eler 58
SFX b4 ecer èce/12 ecer 59
SFX b4 emer ème/12 emer 59
SFX b4 ener ène/12 ener 59
SFX b4 eper èpe/12 eper 59
SFX b4 erer ère/12 erer 59
SFX b4 eser èse/12 eser 59
SFX b4 ever ève/12 ever 59
SFX b4 evrer èvre/12 evrer 59
SFX b4 eter ète/12 eter 59
SFX b4 eler èle/12 eler 59
SFX b4 ecer èces/13 ecer 60
SFX b4 emer èmes/13 emer 60
SFX b4 ener ènes/13 ener 60
SFX b4 eper èpes/13 eper 60
SFX b4 erer ères/13 erer 60
SFX b4 eser èses/13 eser 60
SFX b4 ever èves/13 ever 60
SFX b4 evrer èvres/13 evrer 60
SFX b4 eter ètes/13 eter 60
SFX b4 eler èles/13 eler 60
SFX b4 ecer èce/18 ecer 61
SFX b4 emer ème/18 emer 61
SFX b4 ener ène/18 ener 61
SFX b4 eper èpe/18 eper 61
SFX b4 erer ère/18 erer 61
SFX b4 eser èse/18 eser 61
SFX b4 ever ève/18 ever 61
SFX b4 evrer èvre/18 evrer 61
SFX b4 eter ète/18 eter 61
SFX b4 eler èle/18 eler 61
SFX b4 er ions/14 er 62
SFX b4 er iez/15 er 63
SFX b4 ecer ècent/18 ecer 64
SFX b4 emer èment/18 emer 64
SFX b4 ener ènent/18 ener 64
SFX b4 eper èpent/18 eper 64
SFX b4 erer èrent/18 erer 64
SFX b4 eser èsent/18 eser 64
SFX b4 ever èvent/18 ever 64
SFX b4 evrer èvrent/18 evrer 64
SFX b4 eter ètent/18 eter 64
SFX b4 eler èlent/18 eler 64
SFX b4 er asse/11 [^c]er 65
SFX b4 cer çasse/11 cer 65
SFX b4 er asses/6 [^c]er 66
SFX b4 cer çasses/6 cer 66
SFX b4 er ât/18 [^c]er 67
SFX b4 cer çât/18 cer 67
SFX b4 er assions/9 [^c]er 68
SFX b4 cer çassions/9 cer 68
SFX b4 er assiez/10 [^c]er 69
SFX b4 cer çassiez/10 cer 69
SFX b4 er assent/18 [^c]er 70
SFX b4 cer çassent/18 cer 70
SFX b4 ecer èce/13 ecer 71
SFX b4 emer ème/13 emer 71
SFX b4 ener ène/13 ener 71
SFX b4 eper èpe/13 eper 71
SFX b4 erer ère/13 erer 71
SFX b4 eser èse/13 eser 71
SFX b4 ever ève/13 ever 71
SFX b4 evrer èvre/13 evrer 71
SFX b4 eter ète/13 eter 71
SFX b4 eler èle/13 eler 71
SFX b4 er ons/24 [^c]er 72
SFX b4 cer çons/24 cer 72
SFX b4 er ez/15 er 73
